Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.060

Record of proceedings of commission and of applications.

The commission shall keep an official record of all its proceedings, a part of which record shall consist of a register of all applicants for licensure under this chapter, with the result of each application. The record shall be evidence of all the proceedings of the commission that are set forth in it.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 310; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 9; 1961 c 284 s 7; 1909 c 192 s 8; RRS s 10011.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.